test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-wapam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - wâpamêw - ok : # Wolvengrey VTA1 verb - p 401

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: niwâpamâw
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kiwâpamâw
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: niwâpamânân
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kiwâpamânaw
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kiwâpamâwâw
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: wâpamêw
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: wâpamêwak
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: niwâpamâwak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kiwâpamâwak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: niwâpamânânak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kiwâpamânawak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kiwâpamâwâwak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3PlO: wâpamêw
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: wâpamêwak

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+4SgO: wâpamêyiwa
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+4PlO: wâpamêyiwa     

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: kiwâpamin
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1PlO: kiwâpaminân
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1PlO: kiwâpaminân
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: kiwâpaminâwâw

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: niwâpamik
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kiwâpamik
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: niwâpamikonân # inv +0Sg+1PlO
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kiwâpamikonaw
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kiwâpamikowâw

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: niwâpamikwak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kiwâpamikwak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: niwâpamikonânak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kiwâpamikonawak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kiwâpamikowâwak
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: wâpamik
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: wâpamikwak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+5Sg+4SgO: wâpamikoyiwa

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: kiwâpamitin
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2SgO: kiwâpamitinân
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2PlO: kiwâpamitinân
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: kiwâpamitinânâw

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3SgO: [nikîwâpamâw, nikî-wâpamâw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3SgO: [kikîwâpamâw, kikî-wâpamâw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3SgO: [nikîwâpamânân, nikî-wâpamânân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3SgO: [kikîwâpamânaw, kikî-wâpamânaw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3SgO: [kikîwâpamâwâw, kikî-wâpamâwâw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+3SgO: [kîwâpamêw, kî-wâpamêw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+3SgO: [kîwâpamêwak, kî-wâpamêwak]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3PlO: [nikîwâpamâwak, nikî-wâpamâwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3PlO: [kikîwâpamâwak, kikî-wâpamâwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3PlO: [nikîwâpamânânak, nikî-wâpamânânak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3PlO: [kikîwâpamânawak, kikî-wâpamânawak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3PlO: [kikîwâpamâwâwak, kikî-wâpamâwâwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+3PlO: [kîwâpamêw, kî-wâpamêw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+3PlO: [kîwâpamêwak, kî-wâpamêwak]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg+4SgO: [kîwâpamêyiwa, kî-wâpamêyiwa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg+4PlO: [kîwâpamêyiwa, kî-wâpamêyiwa]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1SgO: [kikîwâpamin, kikî-wâpamin]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1PlO: [kikîwâpaminân, kikî-wâpaminân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1PlO: [kikîwâpaminân, kikî-wâpaminân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1SgO: [kikîwâpaminâwâw, kikî-wâpaminâwâw]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+1SgO: [nikîwâpamik, nikî-wâpamik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+2SgO: [kikîwâpamik, kikî-wâpamik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+1PlO: [nikîwâpamikonân, nikî-wâpamikonân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+12PlO: [kikîwâpamikonaw, kikî-wâpamikonaw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+2PlO: [kikîwâpamikowâw, kikî-wâpamikowâw]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+1SgO: [nikîwâpamikwak, nikî-wâpamikwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+2SgO: [kikîwâpamikwak, kikî-wâpamikwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+1PlO: [nikîwâpamikonânak, nikî-wâpamikonânak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+12PlO: [kikîwâpamikonawak, kikî-wâpamikonawak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+2PlO: [kikîwâpamikowâwak, kikî-wâpamikowâwak]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg+3SgO: [kîwâpamik, kî-wâpamik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg+3PlO: [kîwâpamikwak, kî-wâpamikwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+5Sg+4SgO: [kîwâpamikoyiwa, kî-wâpamikoyiwa]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+2SgO: [kikîwâpamitin, kikî-wâpamitin]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+2SgO: [kikîwâpamitinân, kikî-wâpamitinân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+2PlO: [kikîwâpamitinân, kikî-wâpamitinân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+2PlO: [kikîwâpamitinânâw, kikî-wâpamitinânâw]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-wâpamak, êwâpamak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-wâpamat, êwâpamat]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-wâpamâyâhk, êwâpamâyâhk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-wâpamâyahk, êwâpamâyahk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-wâpamâyêk, êwâpamâyêk]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [ê-wâpamakik, êwâpamakik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [ê-wâpamacik, êwâpamacik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [ê-wâpamâyâhkik, êwâpamâyâhkik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [ê-wâpamâyâhkok, êwâpamâyâhkok]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [ê-wâpamâyêkok, êwâpamâyêkok]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4SgO: [ê-wâpamât, êwâpamât]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4SgO: [ê-wâpamâcik, êwâpamâcik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4PlO: [ê-wâpamât, êwâpamât]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4PlO: [ê-wâpamâcik, êwâpamâcik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+5SgO: [ê-wâpamâyit, êwâpamâyit]
  
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [ê-wâpamiyan, êwâpamiyan]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1PlO: [ê-wâpamiyâhk, êwâpamiyâhk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1PlO: [ê-wâpamiyâhk, êwâpamiyâhk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [ê-wâpamiyêk, êwâpamiyêk]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-wâpamit, êwâpamit]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-wâpamisk, êwâpamisk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyâhk, êwâpamikoyâhk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyahk, êwâpamikoyahk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyek, êwâpamikoyek]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-wâpamiticik, êwâpamiticik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-wâpamiskik, êwâpamiskik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyâhkik, êwâpamikoyâhkik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyahkok, êwâpamikoyahkok]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyêkok, êwâpamikoyêkok]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: [ê-wâpamikot, êwâpamikot]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: [ê-wâpamikocik, êwâpamikocik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+4PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyit, êwâpamikoyit]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [ê-wâpamitân, êwâpamitân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2SgO: [ê-wâpamitâhk, êwâpamitâhk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2PlO: [ê-wâpamitâhk, êwâpamitâhk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [ê-wâpamitakok, êwâpamitakok]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: wâpam
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: wâpamâtân
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: wâpamihk
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: wâpamik
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: wâpamâtânik
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: wâpamihkok

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: wâpamâhkan
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: wâpamâhkahk
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: wâpamâhkêk
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: wâpamâhkanik
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: wâpamâhkahkok
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: wâpamâhkêkok

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: wâpamin
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: wâpaminân
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: wâpamik
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: wâpamîhkan
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: wâpamîhkâhk
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: wâpamîhkêk
